Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5369XS (3) 91 as/js S.F. 2019 Section 1. Section 709.21, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 A person who knowingly views, photographs, or films another 3 person, or attempts to view, photograph, or film another 4 person, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual 5 desire of any person, commits invasion of privacy if all of the 6 following apply: 7